New York, session 2025-2026, S6777.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 2 2590-w to read as follows: 3 § 2590-w. Time limits on certain tests. Notwithstanding any other 4 provision of law, rule or regulation to the contrary, no state assess- 5 ments, state-created tests, state administered tests, tests created by 6 the city district or any other standardized tests or examinations admin- 7 istered by the city district shall be subject to any time limitation 8 when such assessment, test or examination is administered to a student 9 who attends the city district. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06609-01-5